Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
CODE OF ETHICS

Note

Part heading amended by L 1979, c 91, §5.

Attorney General Opinions

As long as the mandatory topics listed in the third paragraph
of article XIV of the Hawaii State Constitution are addressed, the legislature
exercises discretion over what specific conduct is prohibited, permitted, or
otherwise regulated under the state ethics code. Assuming no other state or
federal constitutional provision is brought into play, the legislature may
exempt certain conduct from the state ethics code or otherwise subject it to
related regulation, such as disclosure requirements. Att. Gen. Op. 15-2.

The state ethics code must apply to all state employees;
individual employees may not be exempted from the state ethics code. Att. Gen.
Op. 15-2.

§84-11 Gifts. No legislator or
employee shall solicit, accept, or receive, directly or indirectly, any gift,
whether in the form of money, service, loan, travel, entertainment,
hospitality, thing, or promise, or in any other form, under circumstances in
which it can reasonably be inferred that the gift is intended to influence the
legislator or employee in the performance of the legislator's or employee's
official duties or is intended as a reward for any official action on the
legislator's or employee's part. [L 1972, c 163, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Attorney General Opinions

Section does not apply to receipt by department of
agriculture of gifts from private sector to assist in preventing entry of brown
tree snakes into Hawaii, since the gifts are to be used by department to
conduct official department functions. Att. Gen. Op. 92-04.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next